tests/verbs-IA.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    App: hfst-optimised-lookup
    Gen: ../unm.autogen.hfst
    Morph: ../unm.automorf.hfst

Tests:
  
  "[lexc/twol] (Ch4) iv.aa p1.sg":
    katup<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkatupwi
    ite<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntite
    mits<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nemitsi
    mene<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nemene

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch3) iv.aa p1.sg":
    asu<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntasuwi
    puhenema<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : mpuhenema
    kentk<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : nkentka
    lashim<v><iv><aa><p1><sg> : ntelashimwi

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch4) iv.aa p2.sg":
    katup<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : katupwi
    ite<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktite
    mits<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kemitsi
    mene<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kemene

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch3) iv.aa p2.sg":
    asu<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : ktasuwi
    puhenema<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kepuhenema
    kentk<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kentka
    lashim<v><iv><aa><p2><sg> : kelashimwi

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch4) iv.aa p3.sg":
    katup<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : katupu
    ite<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : litehe
    mits<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : mitsu
    mene<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : mene

  "[lexc/twol] (Ch3) iv.aa p3.sg":
    asu<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : asuu
    puhenema<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : puhenema
    kentk<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : kentke
    lashim<v><iv><aa><p3><sg> : lashimu

  "[lexc/twol] iv.aa p1.incl.pl":
    asu<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ntasuwihena
    puhenema<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : mpuhenemahena
    kentk<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : nkentkahena
    lashim<v><iv><aa><p1><incl><pl> : ntelashimwihena

  "[lexc/twol] iv.aa p1.excl.pl":
    asu<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : ktasuwihena
    puhenema<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : kepuhenemahena
    kentk<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : kentkahena
    lashim<v><iv><aa><p1><excl><pl> : kelashimwihena

  "[lexc/twol] iv.aa p2.pl":
    asu<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : ktasuwihemo
    puhenema<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kepuhenemahemo
    kentk<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kentkahemo
    lashim<v><iv><aa><p2><pl> : kelashimwihemo

  "[lexc/twol] iv.aa p3.pl":
    asu<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : asuwak
    puhenema<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : puhenemaok
    kentk<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : kentkeyok
    lashim<v><iv><aa><p3><pl> : lashimuwak
